Colorado, session 2026A, HB1095.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-70-103, amend (5);
and add (6) as follows:
24-70-103. Requisites of legal newspaper.
(5) When any legal notice is required by law to be published in any
newspaper, the newspaper publishing the notice shall, at no additional cost
to the person or entity placing the notice, place the notice on a statewide
website established and maintained by an organization representing a
majority of Colorado newspapers as a repository for the notices. THE
STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE MUST INCLUDE A LIST OF NEWSPAPERS
THAT SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

IDENTIFIED BY COUNTY.
(6) WHEN ANY LEGAL NOTICE IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO BE PUBLISHED
IN A NEWSPAPER PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE NEWSPAPER SHALL ALSO
MAKE THE NOTICE AVAILABLE ON ITS WEBSITE WITHOUT CHARGE, AND THE
NEWSPAPER SHALL NOT REQUIRE PAYMENT OR SUBSCRIPTION TO ITS
PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL PRINT IN ORDER TO VIEW THE NOTICE. A NEWSPAPER
SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENT OF THIS SUBSECTION (6) EITHER BY POSTING
THE FULL TEXT OF THE NOTICE ON ITS WEBSITE OR PROVIDING A LINK ON ITS
WEBSITE TO A LOCATION WHERE THE FULL TEXT OF THE NOTICE IS
AVAILABLE, SUCH AS THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC NOTICE WEBSITE ESTABLISHED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1095

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1095